epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/kmr.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>
<hyphenation-info>

	<!-- Kurmanji Hyphenation Patterns (v. 1.0 2009/06/29 JKn and MSh) -->

	<!-- (more info about the licence to be added later) -->

	<!-- hyph-kmr.tex -->

	<!-- Hyphenation patterns for Kurmanji (Northern Kurdish) -->

	<!-- (as spoken in Turkey and by the Kurdish diaspora in Europe). -->
	<!-- The patterns are generated by patgen from a word list of approx. 2500 -->
	<!-- hyphenated words provided by Medeni Shemdê -->

	<!-- Copyright 2009 Jörg Knappen and Medeni Shemdê -->

	<!-- These patterns are free software under the LaTeX Project Public Licence  -->
	<!-- (LPPL) version 1.3 -->

	<!-- This work has the LPPL maintenance status `maintained'. -->

	<!-- The Current Maintainer of patterns is Jörg Knappen, -->
	<!-- maintaners of UTF-8 version are authors of hyph-utf8 package. -->

	<!-- For more unformation see -->

	<!-- http://tug.org/tex-hyphen -->

	<!-- The patterns were generated by Jörg Knappen with patgen using -->
	<!-- a list of 2.5k hyphenated Kurmanji words provided by Medeni Shemdê. -->

	<!-- For 8-bit engines the T1 (Cork) encoding is needed -->
	<!-- for the special letters occurring in the Kurmanji alphabet. -->

	<!-- \message{Kurmanji hyphenation patterns kmrhyph v. 1.0 2009/06/29 JKn and MSh} -->


	<hyphen-min before="2" after="2"/>

	<exceptions>
	</exceptions>

	<patterns>
		.ka6ra
		a1
		al4a
		6amît.
		4an
		ar5a6nî
		3av
		4avay
		2ay
		1b
		b4a
		2bb
		2bl
		2br
		2bs
		2bx
		1c
		2cb
		2c2k
		2cl
		1ç
		2çk
		1d
		da6vêji
		2db
		dbû6na
		2dd
		dda4
		2dg
		2dr
		2dt
		d4yo
		4dyû
		e1
		ea2
		e4dy
		ee2
		eê2
		e4fr
		el4a
		erdes6
		er6desta
		e4tr
		2ez
		ê1
		ê2a
		êla4v
		1f
		fl4
		f4lî
		4flû
		f4ro
		2fs
		2fş
		2ft
		2fx
		1g
		2gb
		2gh
		2gk
		g2l
		2gn
		2gr
		2gs
		2gt
		1h
		2hb
		2hd
		2hk
		2hm
		2hn
		2hr
		2hs
		2ht
		i1
		ii2
		il4a
		i4nêr
		ire4h
		i2s
		î1
		î2a
		2îd
		îe4t
		î2j
		îl3
		î4pl
		îsti6ye
		1j
		6ja6va.
		2jh
		2jk
		2jm
		2jn
		2jt
		1k
		2kb
		2kç
		2kk
		2kl
		2km
		2kn
		2kr
		2ks
		2kt
		2kv
		2kw
		2kx
		2ky
		1l
		6lamîtê
		2lb
		2lc
		2lç
		2ld
		l4e
		2lf
		2lg
		2lh
		2lk
		2ll
		2lm
		2ln
		2lp
		2lq
		2ls
		2lt
		2lv
		2lw
		2lx
		2ly
		2lz
		1m
		ma4î
		2mb
		2md
		2mf
		4mîtê
		2mm
		2mp2
		2mr
		2ms
		2mw
		2my
		2mz
		1n
		n4a
		2nb
		2nc
		2nç
		2nd
		nê4re
		2nf
		2ng
		2nh
		2nk
		nki4
		2nn
		2np
		2ns
		2nş
		2nt
		2nv
		2nx
		2ny
		2n2z
		2o
		of2
		o2h
		o2s
		o2w
		1p
		2ps
		2pt
		1q
		2qp
		2qş
		1r
		r4a
		raî4
		2rb
		2rc
		2rç
		2rd
		2rf
		r4fi4
		2rg
		2rh
		2rj
		2rk
		2rl
		2rm
		2rn
		2rp
		2rq
		2rr
		2rs
		2rt
		2rv
		2rw
		2rx
		2ry
		2rz
		1s
		3sa
		2sb
		3se
		2sg
		3sî
		2sk
		2sp
		2sr
		2ss
		2st
		sta4v
		st4r
		3su
		3sû
		2sy
		1ş
		4şa4v
		2şb
		2şd
		şê4l
		2şg
		2şh
		2şk
		2şm
		2şn
		2şp
		2şt2
		2şv
		2şx
		1t
		4tav
		2tg
		tge4
		2tk
		2tl
		2tm
		2tn
		tnî4
		2tp
		t4ra
		t4rû
		2t3s2
		2tt
		2tx
		2ty
		u1
		ue2
		u2i
		u2k
		urandi6
		u2ş
		1v
		2vb
		2vç
		2vd
		2vg
		2vh
		2vk
		2vn
		2vr
		2vs
		2vş
		2vy
		1w
		2wc
		2wd
		2wh
		2wk
		2wl
		2wn
		2wr
		2ws
		2wş
		2wt
		1x
		x4a
		2xç
		2xl
		2xn
		2xt
		x4tr
		x2w
		1y
		2yb
		2yd
		yda4
		2yl
		2yn
		2yr
		2ys
		2yt
		2yv
		2yw
		1z
		2zb
		2zd
		z3e4z
		2zk
		2zm
		2zr
		2zt
		2zy
		2zz
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
